Washington statutes.
RCW 32.04.085

Pension, retirement, or health insurance benefits—Supplementation.

Any pension payment or retirement or health insurance benefits payable by a mutual savings bank to a former officer or employee, or to a person or persons entitled thereto by virtue of service performed by such officer or employee, in the discretion of a majority of all the trustees of such bank, may be supplemented from time to time. The board of trustees of a savings bank or a board committee, none of whose members is an officer of the bank, may set aside from current earnings, reserves in such amounts as the board or the committee shall deem appropriate to provide for the payments of future supplemental payments.

[ 1999 c 14 s 16. Prior: 1994 c 256 s 96; 1994 c 92 s 298; 1971 ex.s. c 222 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—Construction—1994 c 256: See RCW 43.320.007.

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 222: "If any provision of this 1971 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1971 ex.s. c 222 s 9.]